ch.aff
FLAG             long    # two-character affix identifiers
#=======================================================================================================================
# [AK] SUFFIX - AUGMENTATIVE  -ña
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: More X (stronger, faster, smaller, etc.)
#=======================================================================================================================
SFX AK Y 1
SFX AK 0 ña . AUG


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AL] SUFFIX - HAVING ATTRIBUTES OF X  -an
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: Something having attributes of X, or something affected with X
#=======================================================================================================================
SFX AL Y 3
SFX AL 0 an [^aeiou] ATTRIB
SFX AL ao aguan . ATTRIB
SFX AL 0 yan [aeiou] ATTRIB


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AM] CLITIC / SUFFIX - POSSESSIVE 1S  -hu
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: First Person singular Possessive Pronoun, "my"
#=======================================================================================================================
SFX AM Y 1
SFX AM 0 -hu . 1S.POSS


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AN] CLITIC / SUFFIX - POSSESSIVE 1S  -ku
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: First Person singular Possessive Pronoun, "my"
#=======================================================================================================================
SFX AN Y 1
SFX AN 0 -ku . 1S.POSS


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AO] CLITIC / SUFFIX - POSSESSIVE 2S  -mu
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: Second Person singular Possessive Pronoun, "your"
#=======================================================================================================================
SFX AO Y 1
SFX AO 0 -mu . 2S.POSS


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AP] CLITIC / SUFFIX - POSSESSIVE 3S  -ña
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: Third Person singular Possessive Pronoun, "its, her, his"
#=======================================================================================================================
SFX AP Y 1
SFX AP 0 -ña . 3S.POSS


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AQ] CLITIC / SUFFIX - POSSESSIVE 1PL.INCL  -ta
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: First Person Plural Inclusive Possessive Pronoun, "our (with you)"
#=======================================================================================================================
SFX AQ Y 1
SFX AQ 0 -ta . 1PL.INCL.POSS


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AR] CLITIC / SUFFIX - POSSESSIVE 1PL.EXCL  -måmi
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: First Person Plural Inclusive Possessive Pronoun, "our (without you)"
#=======================================================================================================================
SFX AR Y 1
SFX AR 0 -måmi . 1PL.EXCL.POSS


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AS] CLITIC / SUFFIX - POSSESSIVE 2PL  -miyu
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: Second Person Plural Possessive Pronoun, "y'all's"
#=======================================================================================================================
SFX AS Y 1
SFX AS 0 -miyu . 2PL.POSS


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AT] CLITIC / SUFFIX - POSSESSIVE 3PL  -ñiha
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: Third Person Plural Possessive Pronoun, "their"
#=======================================================================================================================
SFX AT Y 1
SFX AT 0 -ñiha . 3PL.POSS


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AU] CIRCUMFIX - LOCATIVE  fan- ... -an  (with 32)
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: Places and times take   fan...an,  ex: fanuchanan -- "the time of rain"
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX AU Y 9
PFX AU 0 fan/32XX . LOC
PFX AU 0 fam/32XX [b] LOC
PFX AU 1 fam/32XX [fp] LOC
PFX AU 1 fan/32XX [ht] LOC
PFX AU 0 fang/32XX [g] LOC
PFX AU 1 fang/32XX [k] LOC
PFX AU ng fangng/32XX . LOC
PFX AU 1 fañ/32XX [s] LOC
PFX AU ch fañ/32XX . LOC


SFX AV Y 21
SFX AV 0 an/31XX [^aeiou] LOC
SFX AV 0 yan/31XX [åaiu] LOC
SFX AV ao aguan/31XX LOC
SFX AV o' uyan/31XX . LOC
SFX AV of ufan/31XX . LOC
SFX AV ok ukan/31XX . LOC
SFX AV om uman/31XX . LOC
SFX AV on unan/31XX . LOC
SFX AV ong ungan/31XX . LOC
SFX AV op upan/31XX . LOC
SFX AV os usan/31XX . LOC
SFX AV ot utan/31XX . LOC
SFX AV e' iyan/31XX . LOC
SFX AV ef ifan/31XX . LOC
SFX AV ek ikan/31XX . LOC
SFX AV em iman/31XX . LOC
SFX AV en inan/31XX . LOC
SFX AV eng ingan/31XX . LOC
SFX AV ep ipan/31XX . LOC
SFX AV es isan/31XX . LOC
SFX AV et itan/31XX . LOC


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AW] PREFIX - 'repeat'  agón-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: To do again (once).  Like re- in English
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX AW Y 1
PFX AW 0 agón . 'repeat'


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AX] PREFIX - 'leftover' BITS OF X   án-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: leftover bits and pieces of X  (ánkanno' -- leftover foods, slops)
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX AX Y 1
PFX AX 0 án . 'leftover'


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AY] PREFIX - SEARCH FOR X   é-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: to search for X
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX AY Y 2
PFX AY 0 é [^éaeiou] 'search_for'
PFX AY é é'e . 'search_for'


#=======================================================================================================================
# [AZ] PREFIX - POSSESSIVE  gai-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: to search for X
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX AZ Y 1
PFX AZ 0 gai . POSS


#=======================================================================================================================
# [B0] PREFIX - AUGMENTATIVE LATIVE  gé'-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: more/further in a given direction (e.g. Gé'haya -- more east)
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX B0 Y 2
PFX B0 0 gé' . AUG.LAT
PFX B0 gé gé'e . AUG.LAT


#=======================================================================================================================
# [B1] PREFIX - AUGMENTATIVE LATIVE  hát-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: more/further in a given direction (e.g. Gé'haya -- more east)
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX B1 Y 2
PFX B1 0 hát . AUG.LAT
PFX B1 h hátt . AUG.LAT


#=======================================================================================================================
# [B2] PREFIX - POSSESSIVE  ká-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: to search for X
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX B2 Y 3
PFX B2 0 ká [^áaeiou] POSS
PFX B2 0 ká [^á] POSS
PFX B2 á ká'a . POSS


#=======================================================================================================================
# [B3] **REMOVE** PREFIX - BECOME X  mama'-    (combo of man- (indef) and fa')
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: **REMOVE** to change into or become X
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX B3 Y 0


#=======================================================================================================================
# [B4] PREFIX - INDEFINITE  man-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: Indefinite object marker
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX B4 Y 7
PFX B4 0 man . INDEF
PFX B4 0 mang [g] INDEF
PFX B4 1 mang [k] INDEF
PFX B4 1 man [t] INDEF
PFX B4 1 mañ [s] INDEF
PFX B4 1 mam [fp] INDEF
PFX B4 ch mañ . INDEF


#=======================================================================================================================
# [B5] PREFIX - CAUSATIVE and PASSIVE VOICE  mana'-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: Combination causative and passive voice marker for Topping class II verbs
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX B5 Y 1
PFX B5 0 mana' . CAUS.PASS
